Utah statutes.
63M-1-2405.    Qualifications for tax credit -- Procedure.
(1)  The office shall certify a business entity's or local government entity's
eligibility for a tax credit as provided in this section.
(2)  A business entity or local government entity seeking to receive a tax
credit shall provide the office with:
(a)  an application for a tax credit certificate;
(b) (i)  for a business entity, documentation of the new state revenues from
the business entity's new commercial project that were paid during the
preceding calendar year; or
(ii)  for a local government entity, documentation of the new state revenues
from the new commercial project within the local government entity that were
paid during the preceding calendar year;
(c)  if a local government entity seeks to assign the tax credit to a
community development and renewal agency in accordance with Section
63M-1-2404, a statement providing the name and taxpayer identification number
of the community development and renewal agency to which the local government
entity seeks to assign the tax credit;
(d) (i)  with respect to a business entity, a document that expressly directs
and authorizes the State Tax Commission to disclose the business entity's
returns and other information that would otherwise be subject to
confidentiality under Section 59-1-403 or Section 6103, Internal Revenue Code,
to the office;
(ii)  with respect to a local government entity that seeks to claim the tax
credit:
(A)  a document that expressly directs and authorizes the State Tax Commission
to disclose the local government entity's returns and other information that
would otherwise be subject to confidentiality under Section 59-1-403 or
Section 6103, Internal Revenue Code, to the office; and
(B)  if the new state revenues collected as a result of a new commercial
project are attributable in whole or in part to a new or expanded industrial,
manufacturing, distribution, or business service within a new commercial
project within the local government, a document signed by an authorized
representative of the new or expanded industrial, manufacturing, distribution,
or business service that:
(I)  expressly directs and authorizes the State Tax Commission to disclose the
returns of that new or expanded industrial, manufacturing, distribution, or
business service and other information that would otherwise be subject to
confidentiality under Section 59-1-403 or Section 6103, Internal Revenue Code,
to the office; and
(II)  lists the taxpayer identification number of that new or expanded
industrial, manufacturing, distribution, or business service; or
(iii)  with respect to a local government entity that seeks to assign the tax
credit to a community development and renewal agency:
(A)  a document signed by the members of the governing body of the community
development and renewal agency that expressly directs and authorizes the State
Tax Commission to disclose the returns of the community development and
renewal agency and other information that would otherwise be subject to
confidentiality under Section 59-1-403 or Section 6103, Internal Revenue Code,
to the office; and
(B)  if the new state revenues collected as a result of a new commercial
project are attributable in whole or in part to a new or expanded industrial,
manufacturing, distribution, or business service within a new commercial
project within the community development and renewal agency, a document signed
by an authorized representative of the new or expanded industrial,
manufacturing, distribution, or business service that:
(I)  expressly directs and authorizes the State Tax Commission to disclose the
returns of that new or expanded industrial, manufacturing, distribution, or
business service and other information that would otherwise be subject to
confidentiality under Section 59-1-403 or Section 6103, Internal Revenue Code,
to the office; and
(II)  lists the taxpayer identification number of that new or expanded
industrial, manufacturing, distribution, or business service; and
(e)  for a business entity only, documentation that the business entity has
satisfied the performance benchmarks outlined in the agreement described in
Subsection 63M-1-2404(3)(a), including:
(i)  significant capital investment;
(ii)  the creation of high paying jobs;
(iii)  significant purchases from Utah vendors and providers; or
(iv)  any combination of Subsections (2)(e)(i), (ii), and (iii).
(3) (a)  The office shall submit the documents described in Subsection (2)(d)
to the State Tax Commission.
(b)  Upon receipt of a document described in Subsection (2)(d), the State Tax
Commission shall provide the office with the returns and other information
requested by the office that the State Tax Commission is directed or
authorized to provide to the office in accordance with Subsection (2)(d).
(4)  If, after review of the returns and other information provided by the
State Tax Commission, the office determines that the returns and other
information are inadequate to provide a reasonable justification for
authorizing a tax credit, the office shall either:
(a)  deny the tax credit; or
(b)  inform the business entity or local government entity that the returns or
other information were inadequate and ask the business entity or local
government entity to submit new documentation.
(5)  If after review of the returns and other information provided by the
State Tax Commission, the office determines that the returns and other
information provided by the business entity or local government entity provide
reasonable justification for authorizing a tax credit, the office shall, based
upon the returns and other information:
(a)  determine the amount of the tax credit to be granted to the business
entity, local government entity, or if the local government entity assigns the
tax credit in accordance with Section 63M-1-2404, to the community development
and renewal agency to which the local government entity assigns the tax
credit;
(b)  issue a tax credit certificate to the business entity, local government
entity, or if the local government entity assigns the tax credit in accordance
with Section 63M-1-2404, to the community development and renewal agency to
which the local government entity assigns the tax credit; and
(c)  provide a duplicate copy of the tax credit certificate to the State Tax
Commission.
(6)  A business entity, local government entity, or community development and
renewal agency may not claim a tax credit unless the business entity, local
government entity, or community development and renewal agency has a tax
credit certificate issued by the office.
(7) (a)  A business entity, local government entity, or community development
and renewal agency may claim a tax credit in the amount listed on the tax
credit certificate on its tax return.
(b)  A business entity, local government entity, or community development and
renewal agency that claims a tax credit under this section shall retain the
tax credit certificate in accordance with Section 59-7-614.2 or 59-10-1107.
